New Jersey, session 222, A3277.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 1 of P.L.1983, c.493 (C.39:3-11a) is amended to read as follows: 1.    Upon application by any person with a hearing loss of a pure tone average of 41 dB or greater, verified by an otorhinolaryngologist (ENT) or by an audiologist clinically certified by the [American Speech, Language, and Hearing Association] American Speech-Language-Hearing Association, the [Director of the Division of Motor Vehicles] Chief Administrator of the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission shall issue to the applicant a special driver's license bearing either the international symbol [of the deaf] for deafness or a numerical code designating hearing-impairment, whichever shall be specified by the applicant.  The international symbol for deafness or the numerical code designating hearing-impairment, whichever is specified by the applicant, shall be printed on the front of the special drivers license.  The design of the special driver's license shall be approved by the [Director of the Division of Motor Vehicles] Chief Administrator of the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission. No fee over and above the required fee for a driver's license shall be imposed for the special driver's license. (cf: P.L.1983, c.493, s.1) 2.    Section 2 of P.L.1983, c.493 (C.39:3-11b) is amended to read as follows: 2.    Pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," [P.L. 1968, c. 410 (C. 52:14B-1 et seq.)] P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), the [Director of the Division of Motor Vehicles] Chief Administrator of the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission shall promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of [this act] P.L.1983, c.493 (C.39:3-11a et seq.). (cf: P.L.1983, c.493, s.2) 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.